RStudio/dictionaries/languages-system/lt_LT.dic
aļæ½aroti/NSTXadefijklmopqruvx
baldļæ½/NPSXYdpqsvx
bandyti/NSTXdfprv
barkļæ½ojo/NPXd
barstļæ½/NSXYacdefhjlmnopqrtvx
barstyti/NSTXacdefhjlmnopqrtvx
beldļæ½ia/ENSXdfjklnopqrsvwx
bergļæ½dļæ½ia/ENSXabcdef
berti/NSTXbcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
betonavo/NPXdl
birzgino/NPXd
bitininkauti/NSTXdfinqrtv
bliaukia/ENXdk
blykļæ½ta/ENXabcdefhjk
blyļæ½kina/ENXdf
blokuoti/NSTXbklnwx
boginti/NTXcdeg
bosta/ENXfnq
braidyti/NSTXabdefhijklmnopqrstuvwx
braido/ENSXabdefhijklmnopqrstuvwx
braiļæ½o/ENSXacdefhjknopqrstvwx
brenda/ENXabcdefghijklqu
brļæ½ļæ½ti/NTXabcdefhlmoqrtx
brļæ½kļæ½niuoti/NTXefjklwx
budinti/DNTXefijk
bļæ½go/NPXcfk
burbia/ENXejk
buria/ENSXbdefjklpw
bļæ½ti/NSTUXbcdefhijklmnopqrtvwx
ceremonyti/STX
ļæ½iauļæ½kļæ½/NPSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
ļæ½iauļæ½kinti/NTXk
ļæ½irļæ½kia/ENXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
ļæ½irļæ½kino/NPXadjkl
ļæ½iupinļæ½ja/ENSXadefhjkmnpqrtuvw
ļæ½iupinļæ½jo/NPSXadefhjkmnpqrtuvw
cukravo/NPSXacfhjklmortvwx
dabinti/STXadfmpr
dailļæ½ja/ENXdfk
dairļæ½/PSXYmr
dalija/ESXadfhkmnprtw
dalina/ENSXabdfhjkmnpr
darinļæ½ja/ENXbcdehjklnpx
dauginti/STXfhjkrvw
davinļæ½ja/ENSXabcdfghijlnoprstuvx
daļæ½o/ENSXadefhjlmpqrtvx
deginļæ½jo/NPXfj
deklamuoti/NSTXfr
dļæ½lioja/ENSXabcdefhijklnptuvw
delsti/NTXdefil
dļæ½ti/NSTXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
dļæ½vļæ½ti/NSTXacdefgikmpqsuvw
dirbo/NPSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
dykauti/NTXdip
dovanojo/NPXadfjkmr
drasko/ENSXacdefijkmopqrtuvw
drebia/ENSXacdefjklmnoqrv
drisko/NPXabcdefikouvwx
dryska/ENXabcdefikouvwx
drovļæ½ti/STXw
dujo/NPXad
dulkino/NPSXacdefjklmpqrtvw
dļæ½mļæ½/NPXabdeghijkl
dļæ½myti/NSTXacdefgijklmnopqrstuvwx
duoda/ENSXabcdefghjklnopqrstwx
duoti/NSTXabcdefghijklnopqrstwx
dļæ½rļæ½/NPSXcdefhijklnopqrtuvw
dļæ½sta/ENXacdefjkln
dvigubļæ½ti/NTXfk
dvysta/ENXadfjkl
dļæ½iauti/NSTXabcdefhijklnopqrtuvwx
dļæ½iļæ½gavo/NPSXfinrv
dļæ½iļæ½sta/ENXacdefhijklprtw
eikvoti/NSTXdhkptw
ļæ½jo/NPSXabcdefghijklmnoqrvwx
eliminuoti/STXfkw
filtruoja/ENSXabdefhinv
gabenti/NSTXbcdeghjklnopqstvwx
gadinti/NSTXadefjkmprw
galvoti/NSTXadfhijkmoptvw
garbina/ENSXcdefhjklorvw
gaudļæ½/DNPSXYadefjkprvw
gauna/ENSXabcdefjklmnopqrstuvwx
geisti/NTXox
generuoti/STXfjkvw
gilia/ENXck
gimļæ½/NPXabcdefhjlmnopqrx
gydyti/NSTXabdefjklmpqrx
gyvinti/NTXf
gluosniuoja/ESX
graibyti/NSTXadefjkmnrv
gramzdino/NPXce
grasļæ½/NXYbcefj
grauļæ½ti/NSTXabcdefhijklopqtuwx
grebļæ½stavo/NPXa
grļæ½binļæ½ja/ENX
griebia/ENSXbcdefjklnopqrvwx
grobļæ½/NPXadfjlqrvwx
grļæ½sti/NSTXbcdefhjklnopqstuvwx
gudo/NPXbceijk
guldļæ½/NXYdefgjkrvw
gulļæ½ti/NSTXabcdefhijknpqrtvwx
ilgsta/ENXfipr
ilsinti/NTXfhj
imperialistinis/BN
investuoti/NSTXhjktvw
ļæ½sijautrinti/STX
iļæ½silyti/SUX
iļæ½siplaukuoja/ESX
juda/ENXbcdfk
juodija/ENXefl
juosļæ½/NPSXabdefhjklmnpqrtvwx
kabinļæ½ti/NSTXabdehjklmnpqvwx
kaiļæ½ioja/ENXabcdfjkl
kako/NPXbdefgkls
kalba/DESXabcdefhijklnopqrvwx
kalbinļæ½ja/ENXabcdjln
kalbinļæ½ti/NTXabcdjlnp
kalinļæ½ti/NTXcdjkl
kapoti/NSTXabcdefijklruvwx
kapstyti/NSTXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
karo/ENPXabcdefhlopqrtvx
keipti/NTXde
keliauti/NSTXabdefgijklv
kerpa/ENSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvw
keturratis/BN
kibti/NSTXabcfjklow
kirdina/ESXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
kirdinti/STXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
kirdyti/STXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
kirdo/ENPSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
kirpo/NPSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvw
kiļæ½a/ENSXabcdefhijklnopqrtuvwx
kiurdo/ENXi
klaidļæ½ioti/NTXdefinqrv
klampoti/NSTXbcdefghjk
klausia/ENXadfhlnqr
klykļæ½/NPXdklx
klyksļæ½ti/NTX
klosto/ENSXabcdejklmnqwx
kniausļæ½/NPSXYcor
kniurvinti/STXiu
konkretizavo/NPSXfkpw
kosļæ½ja/ENXbdfklnpqx
kosļæ½ti/NTXbdfklnpqx
krapļæ½tyti/NSTXabcdefhijklmnopqrstuvx
krapļæ½to/ENSXabcdefhijklmnopqrstuvx
krekļæ½jo/NPXk
krenkļæ½tļæ½/PSXabdefijklmnopqrtuwx
krļæ½sti/NTXabcdefhjklmopqvwx
krimto/PSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
kryptelļæ½ja/ENX
kļæ½rļæ½/NPSXbcdefghijklnortuvwx
kurti/NSTXbcdefghijklnortuvwx
kuteno/NPSXabdfijklmrvx
kvapina/ENXf
kvarkļæ½tļæ½/PSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
kvarkļæ½ti/STXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
kvļæ½pļæ½/NPXcdjnpqvx
kvļæ½puoja/ENSXabcdfghijklnoprtuvx
laisto/ENSXadefhjklmpqrvw
laksto/ENSXadefiklnpqrv
laupinļæ½jo/NPXe
lauļæ½ti/NSTXbcdefhijklmnopqrtuvw
leidinļæ½ja/ENXbcdefhij
leisti/NSTXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
lenkia/ENSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
lļæ½sta/ENXa
licencijavo/NPX
lipdyti/NTXabdejklqvx
lituoti/NSTXabcdefhijklmnopqrtvwx
lydļæ½jo/NPSXbcdefgilr
lygina/ENSXabdefhjklnprvwx
lyginti/NSTXabdefhjklnprvwx
lupa/DESXbcdeijmnpquv
maiļæ½ļæ½/DNPSXYcdfhijkloprtvwx
maklinļæ½ja/ENXdfj
mastļæ½/NXYde
maumoti/NTXk
mauna/ENSXacdefhijklmopqrtvwx
megzti/STXabcefhjklmnqtvwx
mļæ½klinti/NTXk
mļæ½ļæ½ļæ½/NPXcdfjl
miega/ENSXbdfhijlmnptvx
mylļæ½jo/PSXforvw
mynļæ½/DNPSXabcdefgijklnovwx
mokļæ½/NSXYacdfijpqrtuvw
mokyti/NSTXacdfijpqrtuvw
movļæ½/NPSXacdefhijklmopqrtvwx
muļæ½ļæ½/NPSXabcdefghijklmnopqruvwx
nardino/NPXefr
neļæ½ļæ½/NPSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
niauti/STXabdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
nubruoļæ½ti/STX
nurietļæ½/NPX
pabaisļæ½ja/ENX
painiojo/PSXbcdfjklnoprvwx
paiļæ½ina/ESXdkpw
pakrļæ½sti/STX
parpti/NTXdkl
pavydļæ½ti/NSTXl
pļæ½dinti/NTXbcdegi
piginti/NTXbef
pildo/ENSXbdfhjlprtvx
pyko/NPSXcfhjklmnortvw
pylļæ½/PSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
pyļæ½kino/NPXdkl
pjovļæ½/NPSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvw
plaikstļæ½/NPSXYabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
plepļæ½ti/NTXekox
plerti/NTXadefkl
pliauļæ½kļæ½/NPSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
pliauļæ½kia/ENSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
ploti/NSTXacdefijklovw
plukdo/ENSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
plļæ½kia/ENXefkqr
poilsiauti/NSTXfnqrtv
prieļæ½inti/NSTXkr
prisiļæ½ļæ½rļæ½/PSX
puolļæ½/NPXabcdefgijklx
puto/NPSXabcdefhjklo
raiļæ½ioja/ENSXabefhjklmnqrvx
randa/ENSXbdiknpsw
rauda/DENXadfijkopv
raudo/NPXcdefl
raugti/NSTXafjklmvx
rauti/NSTXabcdefhijklnopqrstuvwx
redagavo/NPSXbfhijknqrtvw
registruoja/ENSXcdfhjkloptvx
reiļæ½kļæ½/PSXadfjkmprtv
remontuoti/NSTXfkrvw
remti/NSTXabcfjklnorwx
renļæ½ia/ENXcel
rļæ½ļæ½ļæ½/NPSXYabcdehijklmnopqtuwx
riebļæ½jo/NPXcfk
rioglina/ENSXbcdefijklnopswx
risti/NSTXbcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
rito/NPSXbcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
rusļæ½ja/ENXk
sakinļæ½ti/NTXabcefhjklnrx
sakyti/NSTXabcdefhjklmnorvwx
sako/ENSXabcdefhjklmnorvwx
samanoti/NTXa
sendinti/NTXfkqr
siausti/NSTXabcdefijklmopqruvwx
ļæ½irsti/NTXcfhjloptv
ļæ½iļæ½ruoja/ENXe
siļæ½sti/NSTXbdefghijknpqrstvw
siuto/NPXabcfhlopv
ļæ½yla/ENXabcefhjkl
skaiļæ½iavo/NPSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtvwx
skaiļæ½iuoti/NSTXabcdefhijklmnopqrtvwx
skalbia/ENSXabdefhijklmnopqrtuvx
skambļæ½jo/NPXbdefikl
skaudina/ENXcf
skina/ESXadefhijkmnpqrtuvw
skliausti/NSTXabklmnw
skrido/NPSXabcdefghijkl
skundļæ½/PSXacfjmpqrv
skļæ½sti/STXacfjmpqrv
slapsto/ENSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
ļæ½liuoļæ½ļæ½/NPXabcdefghijlou
ļæ½luostļæ½/DNSXYadefhkmpqrw
ļæ½nekļæ½ti/STXabcdefhijklmnopqruvwx
sniegavo/PSXkw
ļæ½oferiauti/NTX
ļæ½oka/ENXabcdefghijklnopqruvx
spardo/ENSXabdefklmqrvwx
spausti/NSTXbcdefhijklnopqrtvwx
spļæ½jinļæ½jo/NPXc
spjauna/ENXdjlq
sprogdinti/NSTXadefijkoprtvwx
sprunka/ENXcdfi
spļæ½ra/ENXabef
statļæ½/NPSXYabcdefhjklmnopqrtvwx
statyti/NSTXabcdefhjklmnopqrtvwx
staugia/ENXfkl
stovļæ½jo/NPSXbdefhijnopqrtvwx
studijuoja/ENXbdfipr
susislļæ½gti/STX
susiteplioja/ESX
sveria/ENSXabefhjknrtw
ļæ½vilpļæ½/NPXbdefgikqw
tarkavo/NPXcefhijklqrtuvwx
teko/NPXabdfhijklp
tempia/ENSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstvwx
tepti/STXacdefhklmopqrwx
teļæ½kia/ESXaejklmqvwx
tiesia/ENSXacdefghijklnopqrvw
tikrino/NPSXadfhiklrtuvwx
tildyti/NTXefjlrvx
tļæ½sta/ENXdefhi
tykoti/NTXefijk
tolsta/ENXbef
trankļæ½/NPSXYabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
tratino/NPXdkl
trempia/ENXdjk
treniruoja/ESXbdfhprt
trenkļæ½/NPSXbcdegjklnpqsvwx
trina/ENSXacdefhijklmopqrtuvwx
trļæ½nijo/NXYfk
turtino/NPXfiv
tvļæ½rļæ½/DPSXabcdefhklmnopqrtwx
vairavo/NPXbcdefgj
valgo/ENSXabcdefhijklmnopqrstuvwx
vaļæ½inļæ½ti/NSTXabcdefijklnruv
vaļæ½iuoti/NSTXabcdefghijklmoquvw
veda/ENSXabcdefghijklmnopqrsvwx
vļæ½lļæ½/DPSXacejkmoqvw
velti/NSTXacefjkmoqvw
ventiliuoti/NSTXdhijoprstuv
verļæ½ia/ENSXabcdefghijklmnopqrtuvwx
verkia/ENXadefijlmnopqrtvx
verkti/NTXadefijlmnopqrtvx
versti/NSTXabcdefghijklmnopqrtuvwx
veļæ½dino/NPXbdgk
vļæ½ļæ½lino/NPXegk
vļæ½ļæ½liojo/NPXgk
vilia/ENSXaemq
vilioja/ENSXabcdefgjknopqrsvw
vilioti/NSTXabcdefgjknopqrsvw
vilkinti/NTXef
vilko/NPSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstvwx
vokia/ENSXaekmqw
ļæ½engti/NTXbcdefhqu
ļæ½iemoti/NTXh
ļæ½ilino/NPXefil
ļæ½ingsniuoti/NSTXabcdefghijkloqtv
ļæ½vejoja/ENXdfjknvw
